Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5406YC (3) 91 je/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 262C.1 Definitions. 1 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âBorrowerâ means the same as defined in section 261F.1. 4 2. âEducational loanâ means an educational loan, as defined 5 in section 261F.1, for which a loan agreement is entered into 6 on or after July 1, 2026. 7 3. âInstitutionâ means an institution of higher education 8 governed by the state board of regents. 9 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 262C.2 Default on educational loan ââ 10 liability of institution. 11 If a borrower defaults on an educational loan obtained to 12 pay for or finance the higher education expenses of a student 13 incurred during the studentâs enrollment at an institution, 14 the institution shall be liable for twenty-five percent of the 15 amount owed by the borrower as a result of the default. The 16 institutionâs liability shall offset twenty-five percent of 17 the borrowerâs liability for the default. The institutionâs 18 liability shall be governed by the same terms as the borrower 19 unless otherwise negotiated by the institution. 20